Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.009

Application of chapter.

Except as provided in this section, this chapter applies to express trusts executed by the trustor after June 10, 1959, and does not apply to resulting trusts, constructive trusts, business trusts where certificates of beneficial interest are issued to the beneficiary, investment trusts, voting trusts, trusts in the nature of mortgages or pledges, liquidation trusts, or trusts for the sole purpose of paying dividends, interest, interest coupons, salaries, wages, pensions or profits, trusts created in deposits in any financial institution pursuant to *chapter 30.22 RCW, unless any such trust which is created in writing incorporates this chapter in whole or in part.

[ 2011 c 327 s 14; 1985 c 30 s 40. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 67; 1983 c 3 s 49; 1959 c 124 s 1. Formerly RCW 30.99.010.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Chapter 30.22 RCW was recodified as chapter 30A.22 RCW pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.